North Carolina statutes. Chapter 143A. State Government Reorganization.
Article 10. Department of Administration. [Repealed]

§§ 143A-80 through 143A-96.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1975, c. 879, s. 46.

Cross References.

For present provisions as to the Department of Administration, see G.S. 143B-366 et seq.

§ 143A-96.1.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2021-88, s. 14(a), effective July 22, 2021.

History.

1977, c. 70, s. 26; repealed by 2021-88, s. 14(a), effective July 22, 2021.